Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4044
Relation to federal Electronic Signatures
in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Nebraska Uniform Power of Attorney Act modifies, limits,
and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce
Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section
101(c) of such act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of
any of the notices described in section 103(b) of such act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 44.